Maine, session 132, LD2200.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §599-A, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Health care practitioner" means an individual qualified or licensed under state
law to perform or provide health care services to persons in the State.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §599-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 513, §1, is amended
by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
A noncompete agreement between an employer and a health care practitioner that is
enforceable under this subsection must recognize an individual's right to choose that
individual's own health care practitioner.
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §599-A, sub-§3, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. The employee is a health care practitioner who is employed by an entity in which
that health care practitioner does not have an ownership interest.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §599-A, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 513, §1, is amended
to read:
5. Effective date of a noncompete agreement. Except for a noncompete agreement
between an employer and an allopathic physician or an osteopathic physician licensed
under Title 32, chapter 48 or chapter 36, respectively a health care practitioner, the terms
of a noncompete agreement do not take effect until after one year of the employee's
employment with the employer or a period of 6 months from the date the agreement was
signed, whichever is later.
Sec. 5. Application. This Act applies to all noncompete agreements entered into or
renewed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 1 - 132LR3026(07)